Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Damaged Motor Vehicles

186A.500.
Legislative finding.

The General Assembly finds that purchasers when buying vehicles are entitled to know if the vehicle has sustained prior severe damage. The most feasible mechanism for conveying that information is a designation on the title that the vehicle has previously sustained severe damage or has been rebuilt after being declared “junk,” “salvage,” or “water damaged.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 243, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

186A.510.
Definitions for KRS 186A.500 to 186A.550.

As used in KRS

186A.500

to

186A.550

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Brand” means a designation that is affixed as required by this chapter, or that has previously been affixed, to a motor vehicle title that establishes a portion of the history of the motor vehicle and that shall be fixed to all subsequently issued titles for that vehicle;

“Classic motor vehicle project” means a motor vehicle that is:

At least twenty-five (25) years old;

Not in roadworthy condition; and

Either currently in this state and not titled or being brought into this state with a regular title from another state that does not denote it as “salvage,” “junk,” “rebuilt,” or any similar designation;

“Dealer” means a person or business as defined in KRS

190.010

who sells or offers for sale a motor vehicle;

“Junk vehicle” means a vehicle which meets the description set forth in KRS 186A.295(1)(a);

“Motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle as defined in KRS 186.010(8)(a) and (b);

“Owner” means a person who holds the legal title of a vehicle or a person who pursuant to a bona fide sale has received physical possession of the vehicle subject to any applicable security interest;

“Rebuilt vehicle” means a vehicle that has been repaired to a road worthy condition after having been registered as a salvage vehicle pursuant to KRS

186A.520

, or a similar salvage designation from another licensing jurisdiction;

“Roadworthy condition” means a vehicle in a safe condition to operate on the highway and capable of transporting persons or property that complies fully with the provisions of KRS Chapter 189 pertaining to vehicle equipment; and

“Water damage” means damage to a motor vehicle caused by submerging or partially submerging the vehicle in water to the extent that the vehicle was submerged or partially submerged at any water level above the dashboard of the vehicle, regardless of the actual dollar amount of the damage.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 243, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 67, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2008, ch. 157, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

186A.520.
Salvage titles — Conditions for issuance — Operation of vehicle with salvage title.

Except as provided in KRS

186A.555

, a salvage title shall be obtained by the owner of a motor vehicle that meets the following definition of a salvage vehicle:

A vehicle which has been wrecked, destroyed, or damaged, to the extent that the total estimated or actual cost of parts and labor to rebuild or reconstruct the vehicle to its preaccident condition and for legal operation on the roads or highways, not including the cost of parts and labor to reinstall a deployed airbag system, exceeds seventy-five percent (75%) of the retail value of the vehicle, as set forth in a current edition of the National Automobile Dealer’s Association price guide.

The value of repair parts for purposes of this definition shall be determined by using the current published retail cost of the parts equal in kind and quality to the parts to be replaced or the actual retail cost of the repair parts used in repair.

The labor costs of repairs for purposes of this section shall be computed by using the hourly labor rate and time allocations which are reasonable and customary in the automobile repair industry in the community where the repairs are performed.

Airbag reinstallation costs which are excluded from the seventy-five percent (75%) computation as set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be included by an insurer in the computation of the total physical damage estimate according to the terms and conditions of individual policies, provided that the total costs payable by an insurer do not exceed the total retail value of the vehicle.

The owner or an authorized agent of a motor vehicle that meets the definition of a salvage vehicle as set forth in subsection (1) of this section shall, within fifteen (15) days from the receipt of all necessary paperwork required by this chapter, submit an application to the county clerk, on a form prescribed by the Department of Vehicle Regulation, for a salvage title, accompanied by a properly endorsed certificate of title and any lien satisfactions, if any appear, as may be required.

The county clerk shall retain a copy of each salvage title application received and shall forward the original and its supporting documents to the Department of Vehicle Regulation in a manner similar to that for handling of an application for a title.

The county clerk shall rely on the information provided by the owner or authorized agent, including a county of residence designation, on:

Any approved, notarized state form utilized in lien titling or the title transfer process signed by the owner or authorized agent; and

Any document submitted during the transfer of a salvage vehicle from an owner to an insurer.

Reliance on the foregoing by the county clerk shall relieve the office of the county clerk from liability to any third party claiming failure to comply with this section.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall process the salvage title application in a manner similar to that used in processing a title application and the salvage title shall be delivered in a like manner of a title. Salvage titles shall be construed as proof of ownership of a vehicle in a state as to be unusable upon the highways of the Commonwealth. A vehicle shall not be issued a registration for highway use as long as a salvage title is in force.

The only time a vehicle with a salvage title may be operated upon the highways of the Commonwealth is when it is in route to or from an inspection by the certified inspector prior to obtaining a certificate of title after having been rebuilt as per KRS

186.115

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

369.103

, when a salvage vehicle is transferred from an owner to an insurer, the following shall be exempted from the requirements of notarization, including exemption from the notarization of electronic signature requirements of KRS Chapter 423:

The transfer of ownership on the certificate of title;

Any power of attorney required in connection with the transfer of ownership to the insurer;

Any required odometer disclosure statement;

The application for a salvage certificate of title; and

The transfer of ownership on the salvage certificate of title issued.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 64, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 243, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 230, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 97, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; 2009, ch. 54, § 1, effective October 1, 2009; 2020 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

186A.525.
Title for motor vehicle previously with branded title or salvage title.

If a motor vehicle had a brand previously affixed to its title or previously has been issued a salvage title in this or any other jurisdiction, the applicant for a title for that motor vehicle may, at the time of the application, notify the Transportation Cabinet of the prior existence of a brand on the motor vehicle’s title or of the previous salvage title for the motor vehicle. The notification to the Transportation Cabinet shall include the title number and the jurisdiction where the previous brand was issued. Upon verification, the Transportation Cabinet shall issue a title with the appropriate brand for the motor vehicle.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 67, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

186A.530.
Titles of rebuilt, water-damaged, and junk vehicles — Insurance claim settlements for salvage vehicles — Disclosure of title brand by owner or dealer — Voidability of sale without disclosure — Exemption — Administrative regulations.

The owner of a motor vehicle that meets the definition of a salvage vehicle as set forth in KRS 186A.520(1) and has been issued a salvage certificate of title in Kentucky, or the equivalent thereof by another licensing jurisdiction, and has been rebuilt, may make application for a new certificate of title pursuant to KRS

186.115

. The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A governing the form of application.

Upon receipt of a salvage certificate of title issued pursuant to KRS

186A.520

, or similar title issued by another state if the title does not disqualify the vehicle from being titled for use on the highway in that state, and proof of passing the inspection required by KRS

186A.115

, the cabinet shall issue a new certificate of title with the words “rebuilt vehicle” printed on the face of the title. The brand shall be carried forward and printed in the appropriate section on the face of all titles issued thereafter for that motor vehicle.

If ownership of a motor vehicle has been transferred to an insurance company through payment of damages, the insurance company making the payment of damages shall be deemed the owner of the vehicle.

The owner of a water damaged vehicle shall make application to the cabinet for a salvage certificate of title as provided for in KRS

186A.520

. The owner of a vehicle with a brand from another jurisdiction identifying the vehicle as water damaged or other similar designation who is making application for a Kentucky title shall be issued a title with the words “water damaged” printed on the face of the title.

A Kentucky salvage certificate of title may be issued from an out-of-state junking certificate or other ownership document bearing a designation of “junk,” “unrebuildable,” or other similar classification that disqualifies the vehicle from being titled for use on the highway in that state with the following provisions:

The out-of-state junking certificate of title or other ownership certificate shall be an original, secure document.

The applicant shall submit a minimum of two (2) photographs of the motor vehicle showing the damage to the motor vehicle. The photographs shall be included in the application for a salvage certificate of title.

The applicant shall submit a minimum of two (2) estimates of damage verifying that the condition of the vehicle which has been issued the junking certificate constitutes less than seventy-five percent (75%) of the retail value of the vehicle, as set forth in a current edition of the National Auto Dealers’ Association N.A.D.A. price guide.

A salvage title issued under this subsection shall be branded “SALVAGE.” The Transportation Cabinet shall use a unique method of identification to differentiate a salvage title issued under this subsection from other salvage titles.

Upon receipt of a salvage certificate of title issued pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, or an out-of-state junking certificate or other ownership document bearing a designation of “junk,” “unrebuildable,” or other similar classification that disqualifies the vehicle from being titled for use on the highway in that state, and proof of passing the inspection required by KRS

186A.115

, the cabinet shall issue a new certificate of title with the words “REBUILT VEHICLE” printed on the face of the title. The Transportation Cabinet shall use a unique method of identification to differentiate a rebuilt brand issued under this paragraph from other rebuilt brands. The brand shall be carried forward and printed in the appropriate section on the face of all titles issued thereafter for that motor vehicle.

A person who obtains a rebuilt title under this subsection shall permanently affix a plate of metallic composition within the opening for the driver’s side door which states “REBUILT VEHICLE — May Not Be Eligible For Title In All States.”

When an insurance company makes a claim settlement on a vehicle that has been stolen and recovered, if the vehicle meets the definition of a salvage vehicle as set forth in KRS

186A.520

, the company shall apply for a salvage certificate of title as provided for in KRS

186A.520

. Upon receipt of this information, the cabinet shall issue the company a certificate of title to replace a salvage certificate of title. The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A regarding the forms and any additional information which insurance companies shall be required to obtain and submit when seeking a certificate of title to replace a salvage certificate of title.

In claim settlements that do not involve transfer of the vehicle to the insurance company, an insurer shall not render payment on a damage claim for a vehicle whose damage meets or exceeds seventy-five percent (75%) of the value of the vehicle, until the insurer has received proof that the owner has surrendered the title or has applied for a salvage certificate of title as set forth in KRS 186A.520. The owner shall apply for a salvage certificate of title within three (3) working days of the agreed settlement. This subsection shall not apply to hail-damaged vehicles under KRS

186A.555

.

An insurance company shall not refuse coverage to, and shall not reclassify coverage of, a vehicle that has been issued a rebuilt title pursuant to the provisions of this section.

A motor vehicle owner or a motor vehicle dealer licensed in this state who offers for sale, trade, or transfer a motor vehicle which carries a title brand, as set forth in subsection (2) or (6) of this section, shall disclose the nature of the brand to any prospective buyer or transferee, prior to the sale, and according to the following:

Dealer disclosure shall be located on a sticker placed on the vehicle. The sticker wording shall be printed in at least ten (10) point, bold face type, on a background of obviously different color, and shall include the following: “THIS IS A REBUILT VEHICLE.” This disclosure information shall not appear on vehicles that do not have a branded title. Dealer disclosure shall also be located on a buyer’s notification form to be approved by the Transportation Cabinet. The form shall inform the buyer that the vehicle is a rebuilt vehicle and may include any other information the cabinet deems necessary.

Nondealer disclosure shall be made in accordance with the procedures provided for in KRS

186A.060

. The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall ensure that disclosure information appears near the beginning of the application for title and informs the buyer that the vehicle is a rebuilt vehicle.

Failure of a dealer to procure the buyer’s acknowledgment signature on the buyer’s notification form or failure of any person other than a dealer to procure the buyer’s acknowledgment signature on the vehicle transaction record form shall render the sale voidable at the election of the buyer. The election to render the sale voidable shall be limited to forty-five (45) days after issuance of the title. This provision shall not bar any other remedies otherwise available to the purchaser.

The notification provisions of this section shall not apply to motor vehicles more than ten (10) model years old.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, regarding the administration of the title branding procedure. The administrative regulations shall include the manner in which salvage titles and rebuilt brands on vehicles previously declared unrebuildable by another state are differentiated from other salvage titles and rebuilt brands. The administrative regulations may include designation of additional brands which provide significant information to the owner.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 243, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 35, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 128, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 230, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 22, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2015 ch. 95, § 2, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). The reference to KRS

186A.335

in subsection (2) of this statute has been changed to KRS

186A.520

to reflect a renumbering by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to KRS 7.136(1).

186A.535.
Title for classic motor vehicle project — Administrative regulations.

The owner of a motor vehicle that meets the definition of a classic motor vehicle project may apply for a classic motor vehicle project certificate of title, which shall:

Bear on the face of the title the words “CLASSIC MOTOR VEHICLE PROJECT—NOT FOR ROAD USE”; and

Not bear the designation of “salvage,” “junk,” “rebuilt,” or any other similar brand.

The owner of a motor vehicle that meets the definition of a classic motor vehicle project as set forth in KRS

186A.510

, has been issued a classic motor vehicle project certificate of title under subsection (1) of this section, and has been restored to roadworthy condition may make application for a new certificate of title pursuant to KRS

186A.115

. The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A governing the form of application.

Upon receipt of a classic motor vehicle project certificate of title issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and proof of passing the inspection required by KRS

186A.115

, the cabinet shall issue a new regular certificate of title with no special brand printed on the face of the title.

The only time a vehicle with a classic motor vehicle project certificate of title may be operated upon the highways of the Commonwealth is when it is en route to or from an inspection by the certified inspector prior to obtaining a certificate of title after having been restored in accordance with KRS

186A.115

.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, regarding the administration of the classic motor vehicle project certificate of title procedures. The administrative regulations shall include the manner in which classic motor vehicle project titles are differentiated from salvage titles and rebuilt brands. The administrative regulations may include designation of additional brands which provide significant information to the owner.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 157, § 2, effective July 15, 2008.

186A.540.
Written disclosure of damages to motor vehicle.

An individual, or a dealer required to be licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 190, shall disclose all damages to a motor vehicle:

Of which the individual or the dealer has direct knowledge;

Which result in repairs, for items other than wheels, tires, or glass, that exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000); and

That occur while the motor vehicle is in the individual’s or the dealer’s possession and prior to delivery to a purchaser.

Disclosure under this section shall be in writing and shall require the purchaser’s signature acknowledging the disclosure of damages.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 243, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 23, § 7, effective February 22, 2000; 2009, ch. 54, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2017 ch. 139, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

186A.550.
Authority for administrative regulations to conform to federal requirement of uniformity, if imposed.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

186A.510

,

186A.520

, and

186A.530

, if the United States Department of Transportation requires a uniform method for titling salvage and junk vehicles, the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, to bring the provisions of KRS

186A.510

,

186A.520

, and

186A.530

into compliance with federal law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 243, § 6, effective July 15, 1994.

186A.555.
Titles of hail-damaged vehicles.

The provisions of KRS

186A.500

to

186A.550

notwithstanding, the owner of a motor vehicle that has been damaged solely by hail shall have the regular title of the vehicle branded as follows “Hail Damage” if:

The vehicle is in a condition that it can be legally operated on the highway;

The total estimated or actual cost of parts and labor to rebuild or reconstruct the vehicle to its pre-hail condition exceeds seventy-five percent (75%) of the retail value of the vehicle, as set forth in a current edition of the National Automobile Dealer’s Association price guide; and

The owner intends to retain ownership of the vehicle.

A person seeking to have the title of a vehicle branded for hail damage under subsection (1) of this section shall present the sheriff with a statement from the person’s insurance company that the damage exceeds seventy-five percent (75%) of the retail value of the vehicle and is solely the result of hail damage, and shall have the vehicle inspected by the sheriff of the county in which the vehicle is registered. Upon completion of inspection of the vehicle, the sheriff shall indicate on the vehicle transaction record form if he or she has received a statement from the person’s insurance company that the damage to the vehicle is the result of hail damage and if the total estimated or actual cost of parts and labor to rebuild or reconstruct the vehicle to its pre-hail condition exceeds seventy-five percent (75%) of the retail value of the vehicle, as set forth in a current edition of the National Automobile Dealer’s Association price guide. The sheriff shall be paid a fee of five dollars ($5) to conduct an inspection under this subsection.

Upon completion of the inspection required under subsection (2) of this section, a person shall take the vehicle transaction record form and the title to the vehicle to the office of the county clerk in the county in which the vehicle is registered. If the sheriff has certified on the vehicle transaction record form that the damage to the vehicle is the result of hail damage and if the total estimated or actual cost of parts and labor to rebuild or reconstruct the vehicle to its pre-hail condition exceeds seventy-five percent (75%) of the retail value of the vehicle, as set forth in a current edition of the National Automobile Dealer’s Association price guide, the title shall not be surrendered to the clerk, but the clerk shall stamp on the face of the title “Hail Damage”. The clerk shall also enter into the Automated Motor Vehicle Registration System (AVIS) the information that the title has been branded in the clerk’s office “Hail Damage”. The county clerk shall be paid a fee of three dollars ($3) to carry out the provisions of this subsection.

A title branded “Hail Damage” under the provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall retain the brand for as long as the person holds title to the vehicle, and upon the sale or transfer of the vehicle, the new title issued shall continue to carry the brand “Hail Damage”.

An insurance company shall not render payment on a vehicle damaged solely by hail in excess of seventy-five percent (75%) of the retail value of the vehicle until the title has been branded “Hail Damage”.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 230, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.